Missouri, session 2026, HB2200.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 513.475, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 513.475, to read as follows:
513.475. 1. The homestead of every person, consisting of a dwelling house and
appurtenances, and the land used in connection therewith, not exceeding the value of [fifteen]
fiftythousand dollars, which is or shall be used by such person as a homestead, shall, together
with the rents, issues and products thereof, be exempt from attachment and execution. The
exemption allowed under this section shall not be allowed for more than one owner of any
homestead if one owner claims the entire amount allowed under this subsection; but, if more
than one owner of any homestead claims an exemption under this section, the exemption
allowed to each of such owners shall not exceed, in the aggregate, the total exemption
allowed under this subsection as to any one homestead.
2. Either spouse separately shall be debarred from and incapable of selling,
mortgaging or alienating the homestead in any manner whatever, and every such sale,
mortgage or alienation is hereby declared null and void; provided, however, that nothing
herein contained shall be so construed as to prevent the husband and wife from jointly
conveying, mortgaging, alienating or in any other manner disposing of such homestead, or
any part thereof.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.